Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW to read as follows:(1) A proposed project to provide one or more residential housing units within the incorporated areas in an urban growth area designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, shall be considered under the zoning or other land use control ordinances in effect on the subject location at the time a fully completed project permit application has been submitted to the appropriate city official.(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be defined by local ordinance.(3) A local ordinance or regulation may allow the jurisdiction's processing and review of a permit to be paused until applicable fees are paid and notices are posted or delivered. However, a project permit application is not deemed invalid or incomplete for the purpose of subsection (1) of this section on the basis that an applicable fee has not been paid or an applicable notice has not been posted or delivered.(4) The limitations imposed in this section do not restrict conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.--- END ---